Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 9. Provisions Generally Applicable to Employees Hired Before July 1, 2006.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.35.660.
Nonguarantee of employment.

AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is not a contract of employment between an employer and an employee, nor does it confer a right of an employee to be continued in the employment of an employer, nor is it a limitation of the right of an employer to discharge an employee with or without cause.

History.

(§ 38 ch 143 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.670.
Fraud.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be falsified a record of this plan, in an attempt to defraud the plan is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 41 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 51 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 39.35.672.
Pension forfeiture.

The provisions of AS

37.10.310

apply to pension benefits under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

History.

(§ 52 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.675.
Inclusion of cost-of-living differentials in compensation and benefits.

An employee shall make contributions to the plan based on compensation including a cost-of-living differential.

The amount of a cost-of-living differential may not be included in the employee’s compensation for purposes of calculating benefits paid under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

unless the employee has received a cost-of-living differential for at least 50 percent of the employee’s credited service.

When an employee receives a benefit, and if the employee’s compensation for purposes of calculating the benefit does not include a cost-of-living differential, then the administrator shall refund to the employee the amount of contributions the employee made based on the differential.

In this section, “cost-of-living differential” means an adjustment to salary based on the cost of living in the geographic region where the employee works and includes a geographic pay differential under AS

39.27.020

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 57 SLA 2001; am § 17 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (d), substituted “geographic pay” for “pay step”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 58, ch. 82, SLA 1986, provides that this section applies “only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after December 31, 1986.”

Sec. 39.35.677.
Special rules for treatment of qualified military service.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, with respect to qualified military service, contributions shall be made and benefits and service credit shall be provided in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 414(u).

To the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(37), if a member dies while performing qualified military service, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, the survivors of the member are entitled to any additional benefits that would have been provided to the survivors under the plan had the member resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death. For purposes of this subsection, periods of qualified military service are not included in calculations of credited service.

Consistent with and to the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 414(u)(12), a member receiving differential wage payments from an employer shall be treated as employed by that employer, and the differential wage payment shall be treated as compensation for purposes of applying the limits on annual additions under 26 U.S.C. 415(b). For purposes of this subsection, “differential wage payment” means any payment that

is made by an employer to an individual with respect to any period during which the individual is performing service in the uniformed services, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, while on active duty for a period of more than 30 days; and

represents all or a portion of the wages the individual would have received from the employer if the individual were performing service for the employer.

History.

(§ 43 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 102 SLA 2014)

Revisor's notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 102, SLA 2014, adding subsections (b) and (c) to this section, see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 29, 2014, added (b), retroactive to January 1, 2007; added (c), retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 102, SLA 2014, subsection (b) is retroactive to January 1, 2007, and subsection (c) is retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, as introduced by the governor and passed by the legislature, refer to 38 U.S.C. 43 but this statute does not exist. It is possible that this reference was intended to refer to 38 U.S.C. 4301 - 4335.

Sec. 39.35.678.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

The administrator shall use forfeitures that arise for any reason, including from termination of employment or death, to reduce employer contributions. Forfeitures may not be applied to increase the benefits of any member.

The administrator shall determine the amount of any benefit that is determined on the basis of actuarial tables using assumptions approved by the commissioner. The amount of benefits is not subject to employer discretion.

Employee contributions paid to, and retirement benefits paid from, the plan may not exceed the annual limits on contributions and benefits, respectively, allowed by 26 U.S.C. 415. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the administrator may modify a request by a member to make a contribution to a plan if the amount of the contribution would exceed the limits provided in 26 U.S.C. 415 by using the following methods:

if the law requires a lump sum payment for the purchase of service credit, the administrator may establish a periodic payment plan for the member to avoid a contribution in excess of the limits under 26 U.S.C. 415(c) or (n);

if a periodic payment plan under (1) of this subsection will not avoid a contribution in excess of the limits imposed by 26 U.S.C. 415(c), the administrator may either reduce the member’s contribution to an amount within the limits of that section or refuse the member’s contribution.

History.

(§ 76 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.680.
Definitions.

In AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“active member” means an employee who is employed by an employer, is receiving compensation for seasonal, permanent full-time, or permanent part-time services, and is making contributions to the plan;

“actuarial adjustment” means the adjustment necessary to obtain equality in value of the aggregate expected payments under two different forms of pension payments, considering expected mortality and interest earnings on the basis of assumptions, factors, and methods specified in regulations issued under this plan that are formally adopted by the board that clearly preclude employer discretion in the determination of the amount of any member’s benefit;

“administrator” means the commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee appointed under AS

39.35.003

;

“average monthly compensation” means the result obtained by dividing the compensation earned by an employee during a considered period by the number of months, including fractional months, for which compensation was earned; an employee must have at least 115 days of credited service in the last payroll year in order for that year to be used as part of the consecutive payroll years; the considered period consists of

for employees first hired before July 1, 1996, the three consecutive payroll years during the period of credited service that yield the highest average;

for employees first hired on or after July 1, 1996, the five consecutive payroll years during the period of credited service that yield the highest average;

if the employee does not have the number of consecutive payroll years required by (A) or (B) of this paragraph, the actual number of months, including fractional months, that the employee worked;

for an employee who has made an election under AS

39.35.300(c)

or

39.35.310(c)

, the actual number of months, including fractional months, that the employee worked;

for a peace officer or firefighter hired at any time, the three consecutive payroll years during the period of credited service that yield the highest average;

“beneficiary” means a person designated by an employee to receive benefits that may be due from the plan upon the employee’s death;

“board” means the Alaska Retirement Management Board;

“calendar year” means the period beginning on January 1 and ending on December 31;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“compensation” means the remuneration earned by an employee for personal services rendered to an employer, including employee contributions under AS

39.35.160

, cost-of-living differentials only as provided in AS

39.35.675

, payments for leave that is actually used by the employee, the amount by which the employee’s wages are reduced under AS

39.30.150(c)

, an amount that is contributed by the employer under a salary reduction agreement and that is not includable in the gross income of the employee under 26 U.S.C. 125 or 132(f)(4), and any amount deferred under an employer-sponsored deferred compensation plan, but does not include retirement benefits, severance pay or other separation bonuses, welfare benefits, per diem, expense allowances, workers’ compensation payments, or payments for leave not used by the employee whether those leave payments are scheduled payments, lump-sum payments, donations, or cash-ins; for a member first hired on or after July 1, 1996, compensation does not include remuneration in excess of the limitations set out in 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17) (Internal Revenue Code);

“credited service” means the number of years, including fractional years, recognized for computing benefits that may be due from the plan;

“deferred vested member” means an inactive member who meets the five-year credited service requirement to qualify for a retirement benefit;

“dependent child” means an unmarried child of an employee, including one adopted, who is dependent upon the employee for support and who is either (A) under 19 years old or (B) under 23 years old and registered at and attending on a full-time basis an accredited educational or technical institution recognized by the Department of Education and Early Development; age restrictions set out in this paragraph do not apply to a child who is totally and permanently disabled;

“disabled member” means an employee who is terminated, who has not received a refund from the plan and is receiving a disability benefit from the plan;

“early retirement” means retirement for a member who is not eligible for normal retirement and who is at least 55 years old and is eligible to receive benefits under AS

39.35.370(b)

or under AS

39.35.385(b)

or (f);

“elected official” means a person whose compensation results from personal services rendered to an employer as an elected representative;

“employee contribution account” means the total maintained by the plan of the employee’s mandatory contributions, voluntary contributions, indebtedness principal, and interest contributions, interest credited to each of those accounts, and adjustments to the accounts in accordance with AS

39.35.100

;

“employee savings account” means the account maintained by the plan to record the voluntary contributions of each employee, including interest and adjustments to the account in accordance with AS

39.35.100

;

“employer” means

the State of Alaska;

a political subdivision or public organization of the state that participates in the plan based on a resolution to participate in the plan that was approved by the administrator on or before July 1, 2006; or

a political subdivision or public organization of the state that, as a result of consolidation or reorganization that occurs on or after July 1, 2006, assumes liability under the plan of a political subdivision or public organization described in (B) of this paragraph;

“fiscal year” means the period beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year;

“former member” means an employee who is terminated and who has received a total refund of the balance of the employee contribution account or who has requested in writing a refund of the balance in the employee contribution account;

“inactive member” means an employee who is terminated and who has not received a refund from the plan or an employee on leave-without-pay status or layoff status;

“member” or “employee”

means a person eligible to participate in the plan and who is covered by the plan;

includes

an active member;

an inactive member;

a vested member;

a deferred vested member;

a nonvested member;

a disabled member;

a retired member;

an elected public officer under AS

39.35.381

;

does not include

former members;

persons compensated on a contractual or fee basis;

casual or emergency workers or nonpermanent employees as defined in AS

39.25.200

;

persons covered by the Alaska Teachers’ Retirement System except as provided under AS

39.35.131

and

39.35.381

, or persons covered by a university retirement program;

employees of the division of marine transportation engaged in operating the state ferry system who are covered by a union or group retirement system to which the state makes contributions;

justices of the supreme court or judges of the court of appeals or of the superior or district courts of Alaska;

the administrative director of the Alaska Court System appointed under art. IV, sec. 16 of the state constitution unless the director becomes a member under AS

39.35.158

;

members of the elected public officers’ retirement system (former AS 39.37); and

contractual employees of the legislative branch of state government under AS

24.10.060(f)

;

may include employees of the division of marine transportation excluded under (C)(v) of this paragraph provided that

the State of Alaska formally agrees to their inclusion through the process of collective bargaining; and

no collective bargaining agreement has the effect of obligating contributions made by the state under AS

39.30.150

in the event the state resumes participation in the federal social security system;

“military service” means active duty service in the armed forces of the United States;

“nonoccupational disability” means a physical or mental condition that, in the judgment of the administrator, presumably permanently prevents an employee from satisfactorily performing the employee’s usual duties for an employer or the duties of another position or job that an employer makes available and for which the employee is qualified by training or education, not including a condition resulting from a cause that the board, in its regulations has excluded;

“non-vested member” means an active or inactive member who does not meet the five-year credited service requirement to qualify for a retirement benefit;

“normal retirement” means retirement for a member who is eligible to receive benefits under AS

39.35.370(a)

or under

39.35.385(a)

or (f);

“occupational disability” means a physical or mental condition that, in the judgment of the administrator, presumably permanently prevents an employee from satisfactorily performing the employee’s usual duties for an employer or the duties of another comparable position or job that an employer makes available and for which the employee is qualified by training or education; however, the proximate cause of the condition must be a bodily injury sustained, or a hazard undergone, while in the performance and within the scope of the employee’s duties and not the proximate result of the wilful negligence of the employee;

“past service liability” means the actuarially determined excess of the accrued liability of the plan over the value of the plan’s assets, as of the date of the last actuarial valuation;

“payroll year” means the period that includes the first pay period ending in January of a year through the last pay period ending in December of that year;

“peace officer” or “firefighter” means an employee occupying a position as a peace officer, chief of police, regional public safety officer, correctional officer, correctional superintendent, firefighter, fire chief, or probation officer, but does not include a village public safety officer employed by a village public safety officer program established under AS

18.65.670

;

“pension fund” or “fund” means the fund in which the assets of the plan, including income and interest derived from the investment of money, are deposited and held;

“permanent full-time” means an employee who is occupying a permanent position that regularly requires working 30 or more hours a week;

“permanent part-time” means an employee who is occupying a permanent position that regularly requires working at least 15 hours but less than 30 hours a week;

“plan” means the retirement plan established in AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

;

“prescribed rate of interest” means the rate of interest used for computing employer contributions, for preparing actuarial tables used by the plan and for crediting interest to employee contributions and savings accounts, and for charging interest on employee indebtedness accounts;

“public organization” means an organization or entity

created by the constitution or laws of the state for the purpose of administering state programs;

whose officers and employees are paid by a method other than by the state payroll prepared by the Department of Administration; and

whose employees are not required by law to participate in the plan;

“qualified domestic relations order” means a divorce or dissolution judgment under AS 25.24, including an order approving a property settlement, that

creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a portion of an employee contribution account or the benefits payable with respect to an employee;

sets out the name and last known mailing address, if any, of the employee and of each alternate payee covered by the order;

sets out the amount or percentage of the employee’s benefit, or of any survivor’s benefit, to be paid to the alternate payee, or sets out the manner in which that amount or percentage is to be determined;

sets out the number of payments or period to which the order applies;

sets out the retirement plan to which the order applies;

does not require any type or form of benefit or any option not otherwise provided by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

;

does not require an increase of benefits in excess of the amount provided by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, determined on the basis of actuarial value; and

does not require the payment to an alternate payee of benefits that are required to be paid to another alternate payee under another order previously determined to be a qualified domestic relations order;

“retired member” means an employee who is terminated, who has not received a refund from the plan and is receiving a benefit other than disability, from the plan;

“retirement” means that period of time from the first day of the month following (A) the date of termination and (B) application for retirement, in which a person is appointed to receive a retirement benefit, other than occupational or nonoccupational disability benefit;

“seasonal” refers to an employee who is occupying a position for less than 12 months each year where it is anticipated that the same employee will return to the position when needed and includes a temporary employee of the legislature if part of the service for the legislature during each calendar year is performed during a legislative session;

“surviving spouse” means the spouse of an employee who has been married to the employee for at least one year at the time of the employee’s death; the one-year marriage requirement does not apply when the employee’s death was an occupational or accidental death;

“system” means the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Alaska;

“vested member” is an active member who meets the five-year credited service requirement to qualify for a retirement benefit.

History.

(§ 3 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 102 SLA 1963; am § 10 ch 155 SLA 1966; am § 14 ch 83 SLA 1967; am §§ 18 — 21 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 16 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 36 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 110 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 200 SLA 1975; am §§ 9, 10, 15 ch 205 SLA 1975; am §§ 5, 6 ch 27 SLA 1976; am §§ 22, 23 ch 123 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 6, 7 ch 245 SLA 1976; am §§ 12, 13 ch 263 SLA 1976; am § 54 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1979; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 1979; am § 14 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 27 ch 12 SLA 1980; am §§ 47, 48 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 36, 37 ch 146 SLA 1980; am §§ 68 — 73 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 2, 3 ch 27 SLA 1983; am §§ 47 — 53 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 50 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 33 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1990; am § 17 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 18 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 1998; am §§ 52 — 55 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 11, 12 ch 97 SLA 2001; am §§ 44 — 46 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 28, 29 ch 92 SLA 2004; am §§ 117 — 121 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 32 ch 12 SLA 2006; am §§ 77 — 79 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 21 ch 13 SLA 2008; am § 39 ch 8 SLA 2011; am § 31 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986, 2005, and 2008 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Minor word changes were made in 1989 to reconcile amendments to (22)(C)(iv) [formerly (21)(C)(iv)] of this section by chapters 58 and 104 SLA 1989.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In the 2000 amendment of paragraph (4), the revisor of statutes deleted the word “and” set out at the end of subparagraph (4)(A) to correct a manifest error.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in various paragraphs of this section.

Cross references. —

For transition provisions relating to the 1983 amendment deleting “qualified employee of the Department of Fish and Game” from the definition of “peace officer”, see §§ 4 and 5, ch. 27, SLA 1983, in the Temporary and Special Acts; for applicability of paragraph (40) of this section to certain persons not employed under the public employee’s retirement system on July 1, 1979, see § 15, ch. 82, SLA 1979 in the Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves; for conversion of credited service by persons employed as probation officers before May 15, 1990, see § 2, ch. 47, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for legislative intent concerning the 1998 amendment of paragraph (21) [now (22)], see § 1, ch. 22, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “the Alaska Court System” for “courts” in (22)(C)(vii).

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (37)(A), substituted “an employee contribution” for “employee contribution”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 58, SLA 1979, purported to add a paragraph to this section, effective if approved in a special election conducted by the Department of Administration among the active members of the public employees’ retirement system. The amendment was rejected.

Section 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provides:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42-45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986.”

Section 58, ch. 82, SLA 1986, provides that the definition of “compensation” as repealed and reenacted by sec. 49, ch. 82, SLA 1986 applies “only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after December 31, 1986.”

Chapter 205, SLA 1975, which amended this section, was submitted to the voters by referendum and was rejected.

Section 44, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which amended the definition of “average monthly compensation,” modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that Act, which amended the definition of “average monthly compensation,” are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Section 13, ch. 97, SLA 2001 provides that the amendments to this section made by ch. 97, SLA 2001 do “not modify the terms of a contract between the state and a nonprofit regional corporation in existence on the effective date of this Act.” The effective date of § 7, ch. 97, SLA 2001, which amended this section, was March 1, 2002.

Sec. 39.35.690.
[Renumbered as AS 39.35.995.]